Hawaii statutes.
[§353-123] Enforcement. (a) The director
shall provide information relating to the requirements of this part to all
medical and nonmedical staff and correctional personnel who are involved in the
transportation or supervision of female offenders who are pregnant or in
postpartum recovery and other staff as the director deems appropriate.

(b) The director shall provide
notice of the requirements of this part to any female offender who is pregnant
or in postpartum recovery at the time that the department assumes custody of the
female offender. Additional notice shall be posted in conspicuous locations in
any appropriate correctional facility, including the locations in which medical
care is provided within the facility. Any treating physician, midwife, or
nurse of a female offender who is pregnant or in postpartum recovery shall be
informed of the requirements of this part. [L 2011, c 174, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next